Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-503
Definitions, sections found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 9-504 to 9-509 shall be used.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 161.